Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Creation and Alteration of Horizontal Property Regimes.

§ 55.1-2003.
Establishment of horizontal property regime.

A horizontal property regime is established when a developer, the sole owner, or the co-owners of one or more buildings record a master deed or lease, which includes the particulars enumerated in §

55.1-2008

.

Pursuant to §

55.1-1901

, this chapter is superseded by the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1900

et seq.) as of July 1, 1974. No new developments may be established under the provisions of this chapter after that date.

History.

1962, c. 627, § 3, § 55-79.3; 1966, c. 683; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2004.
Partition.

The common elements, both general and limited, shall remain undivided. No apartment owner, or any other person, shall bring any action or other proceeding for partition or division of the co-ownership of the common elements as provided under §

55.1-2007

.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as a limitation on partition by the owners of one or more apartments in a horizontal property regime as to the individual ownership of such apartment or apartments without terminating the regime or as to the ownership of property outside the regime, provided that upon partition of any such individual apartment it shall be sold as an entity and shall not be partitioned in kind.

History.

1966, c. 683, § 55-79.34; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.